Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 289A.10, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Return required. In the case of a decedent who has an interest in property with a situs in Minnesota, the personal representative must submit a Minnesota estate tax return to the commissioner, on a form prescribed by the commissioner, if: (1) a federal estate tax return is required to be filed; or (2) the sum of the federal gross estate and federal adjusted taxable gifts, as defined in section 2001(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, made within three years of the date of the decedent's death exceeds deleted text begin $1,200,000 for estates of decedents dying in 2014; $1,400,000 for estates of decedents dying in 2015; $1,600,000 for estates of decedents dying in 2016; $2,100,000 for estates of decedents dying in 2017; $2,400,000 for estates of decedents dying in 2018; $2,700,000 for estates of decedents dying in 2019; and $3,000,000 for estates of decedents dying in 2020 and thereafterdeleted text end new text begin $6,000,000new text end . The return must contain a computation of the Minnesota estate tax due. The return must be signed by the personal representative. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for estates of decedents dying after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 291.016, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Subtraction. (a) deleted text begin For estates of decedents dying after December 31, 2016,deleted text end A subtraction is allowed in computing the Minnesota taxable estate, equal to the sum of: (1) deleted text begin the exclusion amount for the year of death under paragraph (b)deleted text end new text begin $6,000,000new text end ; and deleted text begin (2) the lesser of: deleted text end deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end the value of qualified small business property under section 291.03, subdivision 9, and the value of qualified farm property under section 291.03, subdivision 10deleted text begin ; ordeleted text end new text begin , the sum of which must not exceed $5,000,000.new text end deleted text begin (ii) $5,000,000 minus the exclusion amount for the year of death under paragraph (b). deleted text end deleted text begin (b) The following exclusion amounts apply for the year of death: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) $2,100,000 for decedents dying in 2017; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) $2,400,000 for decedents dying in 2018; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) $2,700,000 for decedents dying in 2019; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4) $3,000,000 for decedents dying in 2020 and thereafter. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end The subtraction under this subdivision must not reduce the Minnesota taxable estate to less than zero. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for estates of decedents dying after June 30, 2025. new text end